Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Conservators

53-9-10.
“Missing” defined; petition for conservator.

For purposes of this article, an individual is deemed to be missing if:

That individual is missing from the usual place of domicile and that individual’s whereabouts are unknown to those persons who are likely to know;

That individual was serving with the armed forces of the United States during any period in which a state of hostilities existed between the United States and any nation or power and the individual has been listed as missing in action, as interned in a neutral country, or as having been captured by the enemy; or

That individual, whose whereabouts may or may not be known, has been kidnapped or is being held hostage or otherwise detained and is thus unable to exercise control over the management of that individual’s estate.

When a domiciliary of this state has been missing for a period of 60 days or more, or for a shorter period of time but in emergency circumstances that dictate the need for the immediate conservation of the domiciliary’s estate, any person having an interest in the estate of the missing individual by reason of being an individual who would be an heir of the missing individual if the missing individual were dead, a creditor of the missing individual, or a person having legal custody of minors or incompetents who would be heirs of the missing individual may petition the probate court of the county in which the missing individual was domiciled for the appointment of a conservator of the estate of the missing individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-11.
Factors considered by court; qualifications.

In determining whether to appoint a conservator of the estate of a missing individual, the probate court shall take into account any other existing arrangements for the management of the missing individual’s property, such as powers of attorney or trusts, and may determine that no conservator need be appointed if such arrangements are sufficient under the circumstances.

The probate court shall select as conservator of the estate of the missing individual that person who will best serve the interests of the estate, considering the following order of preferences:

The surviving spouse, unless an action for divorce or separate maintenance was pending between the missing individual and the spouse at the time of the disappearance;

One or more other heirs of the missing individual;

Any eligible corporation, partnership, or other business association; or

Any creditor of the estate.

In no event shall the court appoint as conservator a person who would not be eligible to serve as administrator of the estate of the missing individual if that individual were dead.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-12.
Contents of petition.

The petition shall set forth the name of the missing individual, that individual’s place of domicile, the circumstances under which that individual came to be missing, the length of time the individual has been missing, what inquiry has been made as to the whereabouts of the individual, the fact that the missing individual would probably have communicated with the petitioner or some other person of whom inquiry has been made, the names, addresses, and ages or majority status of those individuals who would be heirs if the missing individual were dead, a description of the property owned by the missing individual and the estimated value of the estate, the circumstances that dictate the need for the appointment of a conservator, and whether any other arrangements, such as powers of attorney or trusts, exist for the management of the missing individual’s estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-13.
Procedure on petition; laws applicable to, and oath and bond of, conservator.

Upon the filing of the petition, the procedure shall be the same as in petitions for the administration on the estates of decedents, with the individuals who would be the heirs of the missing individual if the missing individual were dead being treated as the heirs of the missing individual.

The laws applicable to the administration of estates shall apply to the conservators of missing individuals except insofar as such laws may conflict with this article.

Upon appointment, the conservator shall subscribe an oath as in the case of an administrator and shall give such bond as is required by law of guardians.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-14.
Report of conservator; court order.

The conservator shall within 60 days after appointment make a written report to the probate court setting forth the condition of the estate of the missing individual, together with a schedule of any debts that may be owed by the missing person, an estimate of the income from the estate and the expenses necessary to its preservation, a statement showing the names, ages, and condition of any individuals who may have been dependent on the missing person for support, and a recommendation as to how the estate should be distributed. The court, after considering the report and making any further investigation the court may deem necessary, shall make such order as will most effectively tend to provide for the support of any individuals who may have been dependent upon the missing individual for support and for the handling of the property, including any business or business interest, owned by the missing person. The order may provide for the payment of those debts of the missing person as the court deems just and proper. An order of an appropriate court may allow the conservator to engage in such estate planning dispositions of the missing person’s property as are authorized by Code Sections 29-3-36 and 29-5-36. The order may be modified in the discretion of the court at any time upon petition by the conservator, any individual dependent upon the missing individual for support, the guardian of any such individual, or any person having an interest in the property or in any business of the missing individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 43; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 13.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

53-9-15.
Termination of conservatorship.

A missing person for whose estate a conservator has been appointed may at any time petition the probate court that has jurisdiction over the conservator for an order terminating the conservatorship. Upon a finding by the court that the petitioner is in fact the missing individual, the court shall enter an order terminating the conservatorship and directing the conservator to make a final return to the court and to pay over and deliver all funds and property in the conservator’s hands to the missing individual.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-9-16.
Final return; delivery of funds or property to personal representative.

If the missing individual is declared legally dead and the missing individual’s will is probated or administration is had upon the individual’s estate, the conservator shall, within 60 days after demand by the personal representative of the missing individual’s estate, make a final return to the probate court which has jurisdiction over the conservator and pay over and deliver all of the funds or property in the conservator’s hands to such personal representative.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-9-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.